Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4528.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
CHAPTER XVII
Sec. 17b. This chapter applies to the following felonies
enumerated in chapter 752 of the Michigan Compiled Laws:
M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max
LEP H01723'25 a (H-1) nu1c0i


752.53(3) Person C Driver approaching 15
pedestrian crossing in
grossly negligent
manner causing the
death of a blind
pedestrian
752.53(4) Property E Driver approaching 5
pedestrian crossing in
grossly negligent
manner causing the
death of a blind
pedestrian's service
animal
752.272a(2)(c) Pub saf F Sale or distribution 4
752.272a(4)(c) of nitrous oxide
device — 2 or more
prior convictions
752.365(3) Pub ord G Obscenity — subsequent 2
offense
752.541 Pub saf D Riot 10
752.542 Pub saf D Incitement to riot 10
752.542a Pub saf D Riot in state 10
correctional
facilities
752.543 Pub saf G Unlawful assembly 5
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 4527 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
LEP H01723'25 a (H-1) nu1c0i